Arkansas, session 2025, HB1260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Southern Arkansas University for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) President, Southern Arkansas Univ. 1 $322,307
(2) Project/Program Administrator 28
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
*HAR021*
01/27/2025 2:12:38 PM HAR021

HB1260
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(3) Vice-Pres. for Acad. Affairs & Prov. 1 $201,301
(4) IT Pool 13
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
01/27/2025 2:12:38 PM HAR021

HB1260
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Information Technology Manager $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(5) Vice-Pres. for Finance 1 $194,320
(6) Vice-Pres. for Administration 1 $188,485
(7) Vice-Pres. for Student Affairs 1 $188,485
(8) Vice-Pres. for Univ. Advancement 1 $188,484
(9) Dean 7 $173,915
(10) Associate Vice President 2 $166,259
(11) Director of Counseling 1 $154,803
(12) Business Manager 1 $151,635
(13) Director of Physical Plant/Plant Eng. 1 $151,635
01/27/2025 2:12:38 PM HAR021

HB1260
(14) Director of Computer Services 1 $145,572
(15) Registrar 1 $139,183
(16) Director of Continuing Education 1 $136,560
(17) Development/Advancement Admin 4
Development/Advancement Director $135,747
Development/Advancement Manager $123,019
Development/Advancement Specialist $106,139
(18) Director of Institutional Research 1 $132,577
(19) Director of Engineering Systems 1 $128,780
(20) Controller 1 $128,061
(21) Counselor 4 $127,507
(22) Director of Academic Advising 1 $126,225
(23) Director of Admissions 1 $126,225
(24) Dir. of Enrollment Services 1 $126,225
(25) Director of International Programs 1 $126,225
(26) Director of Student Aid 1 $126,225
(27) Director of Media Services 1 $124,824
(28) Associate Registrar 1 $122,932
(29) Director of Public Safety 1 $122,932
(30) Dean of Students 1 $119,876
(31) Associate Dean of Students 3 $113,407
(32) Director of Instructional Technology 1 $106,742
(33) Assistant Dean of Students 3 $106,740
(34) Associate Director of Computer Services 2 $106,740
(35) Director of Disability Support 1 $98,669
(36) Assistant Controller 1 $95,766
(37) Fiscal Support Pool 12
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(38) Public Safety Pool 12
01/27/2025 2:12:38 PM HAR021

HB1260
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(39) Accounting Coordinator 1 $85,136
(40) Grants Manager 1 $85,136
(41) Personnel Manager 1 $85,136
(42) Assistant Director of Computer Services 2 $83,416
(43) Campus Maintenance Supervisor 1 $78,713
(44) Career Plng & Placement Coord. 1 $75,685
(45) Skilled Trades Pool 26
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(46) Assistant Dir. of Financial Aid 1 $72,774
(47) Maintenance Coordinator 1 $72,774
(48) Administrative Support Pool 62
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
01/27/2025 2:12:38 PM HAR021

HB1260
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(49) Assistant Registrar 2 $67,284
(50) Financial Aid Analyst 3 $67,284
(51) Library Support Pool 2
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(52) Purchasing Specialist 1 $67,284
(53) Student Accounts Officer 1 $67,284
(54) Heavy Equipment Operator 3 $53,175
(55) Registrar's Assistant 1 $49,164
(56) Equipment Operator 2 $45,455
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(57) Dir. of Nursing, SAU System 1 $163,881
(58) Department Chairperson 23 $160,134
(59) Director of Library 1 $135,750
(60) Assoc. Librarian 1 $110,077
(61) Asst. Librarian 5 $96,743
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(62) Faculty 200
Distinguished Professor $158,658
University Professor $154,174
Professor $149,687
Assoc. Professor $132,261
Asst. Professor $121,812
Instructor $100,908
(63) Part-Time Faculty 51 $56,046
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(64) Project/Program Administrator 7
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
01/27/2025 2:12:38 PM HAR021

HB1260
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(65) Dir. of Athletics 1 $159,847
(66) Head Coach 3 $146,047
(67) Director of Health Services 1 $135,999
(68) Coach 4 $114,807
(69) Residential Life Coordinator 2 $73,766
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 529

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Southern Arkansas University for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one
thousand nine hundred (1,900) temporary or part-time employees, when needed,
at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification
and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Southern Arkansas University, to be payable from the
Southern Arkansas University Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Southern Arkansas University for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $17,626,055
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,020,000
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 60,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
01/27/2025 2:12:38 PM HAR021

HB1260
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CONTINGENCY 985,303
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $20,691,358

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - SAU - SYSTEM. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Southern Arkansas University, to be payable from the Southern Arkansas
University Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Southern
Arkansas University System for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $45,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 13,500
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 41,500
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $100,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Southern Arkansas University, to be payable from cash funds as defined
by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Southern Arkansas University for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $7,621,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 2,885,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 7,984,500
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 23,530,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,388,625
01/27/2025 2:12:38 PM HAR021

HB1260
(C) PROF. FEES 1,315,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 2,107,923
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 2,500,000
(06) DEBT SERVICE 6,300,000
(07) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 100,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $55,732,048

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
01/27/2025 2:12:38 PM HAR021

HB1260
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.
































01/27/2025 2:12:38 PM HAR021